Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB348.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Title 18 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a section to read:§ 6115.1. Report of theft or loss of firearm.(a) Duty to report.--An owner or other person lawfully in possession of a firearm who suffers the loss or theft of a firearm shall within 24 hours of the discovery of the loss or theft report the facts and circumstances of the loss or theft to the police department having jurisdiction where the loss or theft occurred. The person making the report shall provide the following information:(1) Name and permanent address of the owner.(2) Name of the manufacturer and importer, if 123456789101112131415161718 applicable.(3) Model.(4) Type of action.(5) Caliber or gauge.(6) Serial number.(7) Any other information deemed necessary by the law enforcement officer or police department receiving the report.(b) Sharing of information.--When a person reports the loss or theft of a firearm to a police department, the officer or department receiving the report shall forward notice of the loss or theft with the information obtained under subsection (a) to the Pennsylvania State Police.(c) Pennsylvania State Police.--The Pennsylvania State Police shall receive, collect and file the information forwarded under subsection (a). The Pennsylvania State Police shall cooperate with and undertake to furnish or make the information available to all law enforcement agencies in this Commonwealth for the purpose of coordinating law enforcement efforts to locate the firearms.(d) Penalty.--A person who violates subsection (a) commits a summary offense punishable by a fine of not more than $500.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250SB0348PN0285 - 2 - 1234567891011121314151617181920212223